Oklahoma, session 2025, SB885.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 200 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this act:
1. “Algorithm” means one or more processes, sets of rules,
methodologies, or data used that govern the operation of a social
media platform and determine how content is filtered, ranked,
selected, and recommended to users;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB885 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. “Artificial intelligence” means a machine-based system that
can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions,
recommendations, or decisions that influence real or virtual
environments;
3. “Best interests” means the use, by a covered entity, of
personal data or the design of an online service, product, or
feature in a way that will not:
a. benefit the covered entity to the detriment of the
user, or
b. result in:
(1) reasonably foreseeable and material physical or
financial harm,
(2) reasonably foreseeable and severe psychological
or emotional harm,
(3) an offensive intrusion on reasonable privacy
expectations, or
(4) discrimination based on race, color, religion,
sex, national origin, disability, or sexual
orientation;
4. “De-identified” means data that cannot reasonably be used to
infer information about, or otherwise be linked to, an identified or
identifiable natural person, or a device linked to such person,
provided the covered entity that possesses the data:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB885 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. takes reasonable measures to ensure that the data
cannot be associated with a natural person,
b. publicly commits to not attempt to re-identify the
data, and
c. contractually obligates any recipient of the data to
comply with the provisions of this act;
5. “Machine learning” means an application of artificial
intelligence that is characterized by providing machine-based
systems the ability to automatically learn and improve on the basis
of data or experience, without being explicitly programmed;
6. “Minor” means an individual under eighteen (18) years of
age;
7. “Minor user” means an individual under eighteen (18) years
of age who accesses or uses a social media platform;
8. a. “Social media platform” means a website or internet
medium that:
(1) permits a person to become a registered user,
establish an account, or create a profile for the
purpose of allowing users to create, share, and
view user-generated content through such an
account or profile,
(2) enables one or more users to generate content
that can be viewed by other users of the medium,
and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB885 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

(3) primarily serves as a medium for users to
interact socially with content generated by other
users of the medium, and
b. Social media platform does not include:
(1) an interactive gaming platform that complies with
the requirements of the federal Children's Online
Privacy Protection Act, 15 U.S.C., Section 6501,
and the regulations, rules, guidance, and
exemptions pursuant to such act, or
(2) a platform that primarily provides career
development opportunities, including professional
networking, job skills, learning certifications,
and job posting and application services; and
9. “User” means a person who accesses or uses a social media
platform.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 201 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Safe
Screens for Kids Act”.
B. 1. A social media platform shall not allow a minor who is a
resident of this state to create or maintain an account on such
platform without written consent from the parent or legal guardian
of the minor. The social media platform shall verify the identity
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB885 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

of t he person consenting and the relationship of the person
consenting to the minor.
2. A social media platform shall perform reasonable age
verification methods to verify the age of each user.
C. 1. A social media platform shall provide a parent or legal
guardian with full access to the account of the minor user,
including any posts, messages, comments, likes, shares, reactions,
and other interactions on the platform.
2. A social media platform shall not restrict, limit, or
interfere with a parent or legal guardian’s ability to monitor,
modify, or delete any content or activity on the account of the
minor user.
D. A social media platform shall not collect data from minor
users unless such data is de-identified and shall not use or process
the data of a minor user in a manner that is inconsistent with the
best interests of the minor user. A social media platform shall not
display, send, or target an advertisement to a minor user or use
data collected from a minor user for advertising purposes.
E. A social media platform shall not use an algorithm,
artificial intelligence, machine learning, or other technology to
select, recommend, rank, or personalize content for a minor user
based on the profile, preferences, behavior, location, or other data
of the minor user.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB885 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

F. A social media platform shall not employ a feature, design,
or mechanism that:
1. Encourages or rewards excessive or compulsive use of the
platform by a minor user; or
2. Exploits the psychological vulnerabilities of a minor user.
G. If a social media platform violates any provision of this
act, the Attorney General is authorized to bring a civil action to
seek injunctive relief or a civil penalty.
H. The Attorney General shall promulgate rules to effectuate
the provisions of this act. Such rules shall include, but not be
limited to:
1. Regulations regarding age verification and parental consent;
and
2. Reasonable exceptions to the provisions of this act;
provided, such exceptions shall further the purpose of protecting
minors.
I. Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent or
preclude a minor from deliberately or independently searching for,
or specifically requesting, content or require a social media
platform to implement a minimum age requirement to access such
platform.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND TELECOMMUNICATIONS
February 27, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB885 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)